Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-206
POW/MIA flag; display; when; conditions.

(1) Upon the request of any veterans organization, any other group, or any person, a POW/MIA flag may be displayed on or near the State Capitol, the Governor's Mansion, or any courthouse, city or village hall, schoolhouse, or other public administrative building in this state. Such flag shall be displayed in accordance with accepted flag protocol.

(2) The organization, group, or person making such request shall purchase and maintain the POW/MIA flag.

(3) For purposes of this section, a POW/MIA flag shall mean a flag recognized and accepted by internationally recognized veterans organizations as memorializing prisoners of war and persons declared missing in action as a result of military service.

Laws 1991, LB 313, § 3.